src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

LEXICON adv-cons
+Adv:%>0 K-CONS ;

LEXICON adv-vow
+Adv:%>0 K-VOW ;


LEXICON SHadv
+Adv+Sh:%>0 K-CONS ;

LEXICON CSadv-cons
+Adv:%>0 # ;
+Adv+Clt+Use/MT:% la # ;

LEXICON CSadv-vow
+Adv:%>0 # ;
+Adv+Clt+Use/MT:% l # ;

LEXICON Adverb
ajtu:ajt SHadv ;
aktat adv-cons ; !avtat?
akti adv-vow ;
aktijrádálattjat adv-cons ;
aktsi adv-vow ;
alelt adv-cons ;
allela adv-vow ; !derived noun
almma adv-vow ; !only adj? Spiik: some adj on -a have a similar adverbial form
almmaláhkáj:almma#láhkáj adv-cons ;
almu adv-vow ;
alvvusit adv-cons ;
assát adv-cons ;
avtabuohta:avta#buohta adv-vow ;
avtabále:avt#bále SHadv ; 
avtajrádij:avtaj#rádij adv-cons ; !
avtaláhkáj:avt#láhkáj SHadv ; 
avtatjij adv-cons ;
baddjen adv-cons ; !
badjela adv-vow ; !derived noun
badjelin adv-cons ; !derived noun
bahát adv-cons ;
bajebuttja adv-vow ; !adj
bajkkadærddagin:bajkka#dærddagin adv-cons ;
beras adv-cons ;
beru adv-vow ;
biejvvela adv-vow ; !
bihko adv-vow ; !spiik: o attr adj stems -ot advs?
biktjot adv-cons ;
birraj adv-cons ; !
bissusij adv-cons ; !adj, from bisos 
boassjolij adv-cons ; !
buoragit adv-cons ;
bádan adv-cons ;
bálldal adv-cons ; !derived noun
bálldala adv-vow ; !derived noun
båddåsattjat adv-cons ;
dabdá adv-vow ;
dahppagin adv-cons ; !
dajgu adv-vow ;
dalla adv-vow ;
dallutjij+Err/Orth:dalutjij adv-cons ;
dalá adv-vow ;
dalága CSadv-vow ;
dalánagá adv-vow ;
danga adv-vow ;
danná adv-vow ;
dannága CSadv-vow ;
dannák CSadv-cons ;
dasik CSadv-cons ;
dassta adv-vow ;
dassátjij adv-cons ; !
dasták CSadv-cons ;
dasá adv-vow ;
dasága+Err/Orth:dasáhka adv-vow ; !
davvelattjas adv-cons ; !comparable noun in dim
daŋgas% diehti adv-vow ;
derdaj adv-cons ;
desti adv-vow ;
desti:des SHadv ;
diehki:diek SHadv ; !use/-sub?
dijmmá adv-vow ;
dilla adv-vow ;
doarrás adv-cons ;
duobbelijda adv-vow ; !
duobbilij adv-cons ; !
duoggu adv-vow ;
duohku% diehki adv-vow ;
duohku adv-vow ;
duohku:duok SHadv ;
duola adv-vow ;
duolbbot adv-cons ;
duole adv-vow ;
duolla% dálla adv-vow ;
duonna:duonºna adv-vow ; 
duonnák CSadv-cons ;
duoppe adv-vow ; !
duossta adv-vow ;
duosstelabmusit adv-cons ;
dábbela adv-vow ; !
dábbelijda adv-vow ; !
dábbelin adv-cons ; !
dággu adv-vow ;
dájage CSadv-vow ; !two words??
dájná adv-vow ;
dájvvot adv-cons ;
dála adv-vow ;
dála:dál SHadv ;
dáli adv-vow ;
dálla:dál SHadv ;
dálle adv-vow ;
biejvvek adv-cons ; !prolative
dálága CSadv-vow ;
dánna adv-vow ;
dánne adv-vow ;
dánnága CSadv-vow ;
dánnák CSadv-cons ;
dáppe adv-vow ;
dáppebuttjan adv-cons ; !comp adj in dim
dása adv-vow ;
dássten adv-cons ;
dåbbela adv-vow ; !
dåbbelijda adv-vow ; !
dåbbelin adv-cons ; !
dåbela adv-vow ; !
dåbmarappot adv-cons ;
dåhku:dåhku adv-vow ;
dåhku:dåk SHadv ;
dåla adv-vow ;
dålebut adv-cons ;
dåmi adv-vow ;
dånna:dånºna adv-vow ; 
dåppebut adv-cons ;
dåppet adv-cons ;
dåsi adv-vow ;
dåssjå adv-vow ;
dåvla adv-vow ;
edasihke adv-vow ;
edisik adv-cons ;
esski adv-vow ;
farra adv-vow ;
fágajgasskasattjat adv-cons ;
fássta adv-vow ;
galla adv-vow ;
galluga CSadv-vow ;
galluk CSadv-cons ;
galládin adv-cons ;
ganna adv-vow ;
gasskaj adv-cons ;
gidábuttjat adv-cons ; !
giehtsuláj+Err/Orth:giet#suláj adv-cons ; !AK: gieht-
giehttji adv-vow ;
giesebuttjaj adv-cons ; !
girkkásit adv-cons ;
gitta+Err/Orth:gihtta adv-vow ;
goappelt adv-cons ;
goassa adv-vow ;
goassak CSadv-cons ;
goassak+Err/Orth:guossak CSadv-cons ; !added because of many typos
goassak+Err/Orth:goassek CSadv-cons ; !from Anta Pirak, maybe not err/orth
goassik CSadv-cons ;
guhkebuj adv-cons ; !adj
guhkken adv-cons ; !adj
guhtti adv-vow ;
gullunagá adv-vow ;
guluna adv-vow ;
gulunagá adv-vow ; !XXXse gulunagi 
guoktel adv-cons ; !derived noun
guokti adv-vow ;
guoron adv-cons ;
guovddelav adv-cons ; !derived noun
guovteláhkáj:guovte#láhkáj adv-cons ;
guovtá adv-vow ;
gánnu adv-vow ;
gárggot adv-cons ;
gáttebuttjaj adv-cons ; !comp noun dim
gåbdugit adv-cons ;
gåggu adv-vow ;
gågguk CSadv-cons ;
gåktu+Err/Orth:gåkto adv-vow ;
gåktu:gåk SHadv ;
gåktuk CSadv-cons ;
gåktå adv-vow ;
gåle adv-vow ;
gålles adv-cons ;
gåmu adv-vow ;
gånnek CSadv-cons ;
gånnå adv-vow ;
gånnåk CSadv-cons ;
gåsi adv-vow ;
gåsik CSadv-cons ;
gåsstek CSadv-cons ;
gåsstå adv-vow ;
gåsståk CSadv-cons ;
gæhppadit adv-cons ;
gætjo adv-vow ; !Spiik: -o adj stems (attr) build adverbs on -ot
hoaben adv-cons ;
háhtsagin adv-cons ;
hármmadit adv-cons ;
hårråt adv-cons ;
idedis adv-cons ;
iektu adv-vow ;
ienebut adv-cons ;
ierijda+Err/Orth:ierida adv-vow ;
iesjguhtik% láhkáj adv-cons ;
ihkabe adv-vow ;
ihkap adv-cons ;
ihkeve adv-vow ;
ihkevin+Err/Orth:iehkevin adv-cons ;
innis adv-cons ; !OK:innan ....?
ja% de adv-vow ;
jalik CSadv-cons ;
jallat adv-cons ;
juobbela adv-vow ; !
juobbelij adv-cons ; !
juogguk CSadv-cons ;
juoŋgaláhkáj:juoŋga#láhkáj adv-cons ;
juska adv-vow ; 
jáhkulisát adv-cons ;
jåhtelabmusit adv-cons ;
jæbdda adv-vow ;
lagábuj adv-cons ; !adj
lahkulakkoj adv-cons ;
libbogisát adv-cons ;
vuologit+Err/Der:vuologisát adv-cons ;
lijká adv-vow ; !OK: lika ...
lubttsot adv-cons ;
lullde adv-vow ; !OK:østerifrån
lullelij adv-cons ; !   !derived noun
luoboj adv-cons ;
lurvvot adv-cons ;
lájttalahtte adv-vow ; !pres part of lájttalahtte, but form not generated by verb file
låddnjot adv-cons ;
låhkki adv-vow ;
makte adv-vow ;
maktes adv-cons ;
maŋebuttjan adv-cons ; !comp noun dim
maŋemussaj+Err/Orth:manemussaj adv-cons ; !comp noun
maŋenagi+Err/Orth:manenagi adv-vow ; !added becuase of many typos
maŋutjissaj adv-cons ;
maŋŋelattja adv-vow ; !   !derived noun
maŋŋelattjabun adv-cons ; !
maŋŋet adv-cons ;
mieddel adv-cons ; !
miehtelis adv-cons ; !
moaddi adv-vow ;
moasken adv-cons ;
muson adv-cons ; !
máŋŋgi adv-vow ;
mådtsot adv-cons ;
mælggadij adv-cons ; !adj
nalta adv-vow ; !
nanna:nan SHadv ; !
nanne adv-vow ; !
nannusappot adv-cons ;
navti:nav SHadv ;
navtik CSadv-cons ;
niellji adv-vow ;
nievret adv-cons ;
njunnjelin adv-cons ; !
nuortabun adv-cons ; !adj
nuortasluksa adv-vow ; !
nuorttalappot adv-cons ;
nuorttalullelattja:nuortta#lullelattja adv-vow ; !   !cmp derived noun
nuorttalullelattjan:nuortta#lullelattjan adv-cons ; ! !cmp derived noun
nuppeláhkáj:nuppe#láhkáj adv-cons ;
návti:náv SHadv ; 
nåbe adv-vow ;
nåvte adv-vow ;
nåvti:nåv SHadv ;
nåvtik CSadv-cons ;
oabllát adv-cons ;
oalle adv-vow ;
oanegisláhkáj:oanegis#láhkáj adv-cons ;
oarjjealás:oarjje#alás adv-cons ;
oarjjelulás:oarjje#lulás adv-cons ;
rahppot adv-cons ;
rastá adv-vow ;
riektaláhkáj:riekta#láhkáj adv-cons ;
roahkkot adv-cons ;
ruvvaláhkáj:ruvva#láhkáj adv-cons ;
rájnna adv-vow ;
råtjegit adv-cons ;
siegen adv-cons ; !
siejgga adv-vow ; !
sihkarit adv-cons ;
sinna adv-vow ; !
sinna:sin SHadv ; !
sisste adv-vow ; !
sjkirnnjot adv-cons ;
sliggot adv-cons ;
smájvva adv-vow ; !
spájtta adv-vow ;
stajggagit adv-cons ;
survvot adv-cons ;
sælldásit adv-cons ;
sæmmi adv-vow ;
tjargga adv-vow ;
tjiehpet adv-cons ;
tjuohtti adv-vow ;
tjuollot adv-cons ;
tsibin adv-cons ;
uddnik CSadv-cons ;
ukselis adv-cons ; !derived noun
vadi adv-vow ;
valjebut adv-cons ;
vallak CSadv-cons ;
vasti adv-vow ;
vasten:vasten adv-cons ;
vehik CSadv-cons ;
vehak CSadv-cons ;
viehka:viehka adv-vow ; 
viehka:viek SHadv ;
vijddásappot adv-cons ;
világa adv-vow ;
vuojnunagá adv-vow ;
vuolebusj adv-cons ; !compnoun dim
vuollelattja adv-vow ; !  derived noun
vuollen adv-cons ; !
vuosstelis adv-cons ; !
várrek adv-cons ; !prolative
ábtsá adv-vow ;
ájbas adv-cons ;
ájlá adv-vow ;
ájádalák CSadv-cons ;
álbet adv-cons ;
álu adv-vow ;
árabut adv-cons ;
åbbuna adv-vow ;
åbbånagi adv-vow ;
åjtu adv-vow ;
ålggolattjaj adv-cons ; !derived noun
ållunagi adv-vow ;
ålobut adv-cons ;
åvddåla adv-vow ; !  derived noun
åvdås% guovlluj+MWE+Err/Orth:åvdås#guovlluj adv-cons ; !
åvdutjis+Err/Orth:åvtutjis adv-cons ;
åvtåbále:åvtå#bále adv-vow ; !
åvvånagi adv-vow ;
ænndu adv-vow ;
dálátjij adv-cons ;
nuovti:nuov SHadv ;
måtso adv-vow ; !rett over, snarvei, tvers over, Grundstrøm 561
a% la% carte+MWE:a% la% carte adv-vow ;
gåro% bielen+Use/MT:gåro% bielen adv-cons ;
dahkkerievtesvuoda% bokte+Use/MT:dahkkerievtesvuoda% bokte adv-vow ; !sme dahkkivuoigatvuođalaččat
ájges% ájggáj+Use/MT:ájges% ájggáj adv-vow ; ! sme áiggil
soajttemláhkáj:soajttem#láhkáj adv-cons ;
sæmmi% båttå+Use/MT:sæmmi% båttå adv-vow ;  
dan% ájggáj+Use/MT:dan% ájggáj adv-vow ; ! sme áiggil
